Kentucky statutes. TITLE LI Unified Juvenile Code
CHAPTER 645 Mental Health Act
645.270.
Duty of mental health professional to warn intended victim of patient’s threat of violence.

No monetary liability and no cause of action shall arise against any mental health professional or person serving in a counselor role for failing to predict, warn or take precautions to provide protection from a patient’s violent behavior, unless the patient has communicated to the mental health professional or person serving in a counselor role an actual threat of physical violence against a clearly identified or reasonably identified victim, or unless the patient has communicated to the mental health professional or other person serving in a counselor role an actual threat of some specific violent act.

The duty to warn or to take reasonable precautions to provide protection from violent behavior arises only under limited circumstances specified in subsection (1) of this section. The duty to warn a clearly or reasonably identifiable victim shall be discharged by the mental health professional or person serving in a counselor role if reasonable efforts are made to communicate the threat to the victim and to notify the law enforcement office closest to the patient’s and the victim’s residence of the threat of violence. If the patient has communicated to the mental health professional or person serving in a counselor role an actual threat of some specific violent act and no particular victim is identifiable, the duty to warn has been discharged if reasonable efforts are made to communicate the threat to law enforcement authorities. The duty to take reasonable precautions to provide protection from violent behavior shall be satisfied if reasonable efforts are made to seek civil commitment of the child under KRS Chapter 645.

No monetary liability and no cause of action shall arise against any mental health professional or person serving in a counselor role for confidences disclosed to third parties in an effort to discharge a duty arising under this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 350, § 128, effective April 10, 1988; 2002, ch. 99, § 6, effective March 28, 2002.

645.280.
Place where child to be held.

No child held under the provisions of this chapter shall be held in a secure juvenile detention facility unless a status offense action or public offense action is also pending. No peace officer or any other person shall bring a status offense action or a public offense action against a child who is mentally ill and in need of hospitalization pursuant to this chapter solely or primarily for the purpose of avoiding transporting the child to a hospital, mental health facility, or other less restrictive alternative.

If, after evaluation, the qualified mental health professional finds that the child does not meet the criteria for involuntary hospitalization and the peace officer has reason to believe that the child has committed a status offense or public offense, the peace officer may proceed in accordance with KRS

610.190

to

610.290

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 498, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 2014, ch. 132, § 53, effective July 15, 2014.

645.990.
Penalty.

Any person who intentionally causes the unwarranted hospitalization of any individual under this chapter or the denial to any individual of any of the rights accorded to him under this chapter or the administrative regulations issued thereunder shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 423, § 171, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 129, effective April 10, 1988.